src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON	_N4341

 ! non possessive forms

+N+Sg+Nom:ыӈ K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ыӈт K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:ӈын K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ыӈныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:ӈыл K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:ӈиг K ;

+N+Du+Nom:ӈыг K ;
+N+Du+Loc:ӈыгт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:ӈыгн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:ӈыгныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:ӈыгтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:ӈыт K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:ӈытт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:ӈытн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:ӈытын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:ӈытныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:ӈытыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:ӈум K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:ӈумт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:ӈумн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:ӈумныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:ӈумтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:ӈагум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:ӈагумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:ӈагумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:ӈагумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:ӈагумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:ӈанум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:ӈанумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:ӈанумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:ӈанумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:ӈанумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:ӈын K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:ӈынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:ӈынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:ӈынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:ӈынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:ӈагын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:ӈагынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:ӈагынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:ӈагынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:ӈагынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ӈан K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:ӈант K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:ӈанн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:ӈанныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:ӈантыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ӈанын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:ӈанынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:ӈанынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:ӈанынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:ӈанынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:ӈе K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:ӈет K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:ӈен K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:ӈеныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:ӈетыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:ӈаге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:ӈагет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:ӈаген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:ӈагеныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:ӈагетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:ӈанэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:ӈанэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:ӈанэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:ӈанэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:ӈанэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ыӈме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ыӈме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ыӈме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ыӈме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ыӈме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:ӈагме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:ӈагме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:ӈагме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:ӈагме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:ӈагме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:ӈанме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:ӈанме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:ӈанме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:ӈанме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:ӈанме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:ӈын K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:ӈынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:ӈынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:ӈынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:ӈынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:ӈагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:ӈагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:ӈагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:ӈагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:ӈагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ӈаны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:ӈаны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:ӈаны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:ӈаны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:ӈаны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ӈан K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:ӈант K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:ӈанн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:ӈанныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:ӈантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:ӈе̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:ӈе̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:ӈе̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:ӈе̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:ӈе̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:ӈаге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:ӈаге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:ӈаге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:ӈаге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:ӈаге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:ӈанэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:ӈанэнт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:ӈанэнн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:ӈанэнныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:ӈанэнтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:ӈув K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:ӈувт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:ӈувн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:ӈувныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:ӈувтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:ӈагув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:ӈагувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:ӈагувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:ӈагувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:ӈагувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:ӈанув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:ӈанувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:ӈанувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:ӈанувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:ӈанувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:ӈы̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:ӈы̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:ӈы̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:ӈы̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:ӈы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:ӈагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:ӈагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:ӈагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:ӈагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:ӈагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ӈаны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:ӈаны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:ӈаны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:ӈаны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:ӈаны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ӈан K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:ӈант K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:ӈанн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:ӈанныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:ӈантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:ӈаныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:ӈанылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:ӈанылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:ӈанылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:ӈанылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:ӈага̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:ӈага̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:ӈага̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:ӈага̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:ӈага̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:ӈананыл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:ӈананылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:ӈананылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:ӈананылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:ӈананылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:ӈа̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:ӈа̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:ӈа̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:ӈа̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:ӈа̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
